Maryland, session 2025, SB0031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
15–601.1.
(a) In this section, “disposable wages” means the part of wages that remain after
deduction of any amount required to be withheld by law.
(b) The following are exempt from attachment:
(1) The greater of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0031*

SENATE BILL 31
(i) [75 percent] 75% of the disposable wages AND SOCIAL
SECURITY, DISABILITY, OR UNEMPLOYMENT BENEFITS due; or
(ii) [30 times the State minimum hourly wage in effect at the time
the wages are due,] 150% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL FOR WEEKLY INCOME AS
DETERMINED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES FOR A
HOUSEHOLD OF THE JUDGMENT DEBTOR’S SIZE multiplied by the number of weeks
during which the wages due were earned; and
(2) Any medical insurance payment deducted from an employee’s wages by
the employer.
(c) The amount subject to attachment shall be calculated per pay period
15–603.
(a) While the attachment remains a lien, the employer/garnishee shall withhold
all attachable wages payable to the judgment debtor and remit the amount withheld to the
judgment creditor or his legal representative within 15 days after the close of the last pay
period in each month.
(b) If the employer/garnishee is served with more than one attachment against
the same judgment debtor, then the attachments shall be satisfied in the order in which
they were served, and each prior attachment must be satisfied before any effect can be
given to a subsequent attachment.
(C) WHEN AN EMPLOYER/GARNISHEE IS SERVED WITH AN ATTACHMENT,
THE EMPLOYER/GARNISHEE SHALL NOTIFY THE JUDGMENT DEBTOR IN WRITING OF:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF WAGES EXEMPT FROM ATTACHMENT UNDER §
15–601.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) THE METHOD USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNT OF ATTACHABLE
WAGES; AND
(3) THE PROCEDURE BY WHICH THE JUDGMENT DEBTOR MAY
CONTEST THE ATTACHMENT UNDER MARYLAND RULE 3–646.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.